North Carolina, session 2025, SB341.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,450,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Siler City for
its downtown streetscape project. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for running underground power lines and
widening sidewalks for outside dining along Chatham Avenue during Phase
1.
(2) Four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) for implementing design plans
and hiring a main street coordinator during Phase 2.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S341-v-1*